Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.290

Minor violations, warning notice in writing.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report for prosecution or for the institution of condemnation proceedings minor violations of this chapter when the director believes that the public interest will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

[ 1989 c 380 s 25; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 29.]